Hawaii, session 2025, SB552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§141-    Healthy soils program; established.  (a) The department of agriculture shall establish a healthy soils program.  The department of agriculture may consult with or contract a third party for any needed expertise to perform its duties pursuant to this section.  The healthy soils program shall: (1)  Create a statewide soil health assessment with a list of practices specific to the State that are most effective in improving soil health and building soil carbon stocks; (2)  Provide farmers with education and technical assistance to implement farm management practices that contribute to healthy soils; (3)  Establish standards that apply to the healthy soils program and are based on the findings of the greenhouse gas sequestration task force established pursuant to section 225P-4 relating to minimum levels of soil carbon and water content and required soil health practices; and (4)  Subject to available funding, issue awards and other financial incentives to implement farm management practices that contribute to healthy soils. (b)  The long-term goals of the healthy soils program shall be to establish: (1)  Deadlines by which all awards issued by the department of agriculture shall meet the standards established pursuant to subsection (a)(3); (2)  Deadlines by which a plan for all state lands leased for agricultural use shall be required; and (3)  Programs incentivizing small farmers, ranchers, and landowners to take carbon negative actions on their respective lands. (c)  The department of agriculture shall submit a report detailing the status and progress of the healthy soils program and its recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session." SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the healthy soils program and to issue awards and other financial incentives pursuant to the program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________